Florida, session 2026, SB200.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 31 32 Section 1.âSection 163.3205, Florida Statutes, is amended 33 to read: 34 163.3205âSolar facility approval process; decommissioning 35 requirements; construction requirements.â 36 (1)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT.âIt is the intent of the Legislature 37 to encourage renewable solar electrical generation throughout 38 this state, while ensuring that agricultural land used for a 39 solar facility be returned to its original state and be viable 40 for agricultural use at the end of the solar facilityâs useful 41 life. It is essential that solar facilities and associated 42 electric infrastructure be constructed and maintained in various 43 locations throughout this state in order to ensure the 44 availability of renewable energy production, which is critical 45 to this stateâs energy and economic future. 46 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 47 (a)ââAgricultural landâ means land within: 48 1.âAn area categorized as agricultural land in a local 49 government comprehensive plan. Such categorization includes any 50 agricultural land use category; or 51 2.âAn agricultural zoning district within an unincorporated 52 area. 53 (b)ââDecommissionâ means the removal of a solar facility 54 and return of agricultural land that was used for the solar 55 facility to an agriculturally useful condition similar to that 56 which existed before construction of the solar facility, 57 including the removal of above-ground facilities and 58 infrastructure that do not serve a continuing purpose. 59 (c)ââSolar facilityâ means a production facility for 60 electric power which: 61 1.(a)âUses photovoltaic modules to convert solar energy to 62 electricity that may be stored on site, delivered to a 63 transmission system, and consumed primarily offsite. 64 2.(b)âConsists principally of photovoltaic modules, a 65 mounting or racking system, power inverters, transformers, 66 collection systems, battery systems, fire suppression equipment, 67 and associated components. 68 3.(c)âMay include accessory administration or maintenance 69 buildings, electric transmission lines, substations, energy 70 storage equipment, and related accessory uses and structures. 71 (3)âPERMITTED USE.âA solar facility is shall be a permitted 72 use in all agricultural land use categories in a local 73 government comprehensive plan and all agricultural zoning 74 districts within an unincorporated area and must comply with the 75 setback and landscaped buffer area criteria for other similar 76 uses in the agricultural district. 77 (4)âLANDSCAPE REQUIREMENTS.âA county may adopt an ordinance 78 specifying buffer and landscaping requirements for solar 79 facilities. Such requirements may not exceed the requirements 80 for similar uses involving the construction of other facilities 81 that are permitted uses in agricultural land use categories and 82 zoning districts. 83 (5)âDECOMMISSIONING.âA county may adopt an ordinance 84 requiring that a solar facility with a generating capacity of 1 85 megawatt or more be properly decommissioned within 24 months 86 after notice to the solar facility owner that the facility has 87 reached the end of its useful life. 88 (a)âIt is presumed that a solar facility has reached the 89 end of its useful life if: 90 1.âThe solar facility fails to produce power for a period 91 of 12 months after construction of the solar facility has been 92 completed. This 12-month period does not include a period in 93 which the solar facility does not produce power due to a 94 disaster or other event beyond the control of the facility 95 owner; or 96 2.âThe solar facility has been abandoned. A solar facility 97 is considered abandoned if: 98 a.âAfter commencement of the solar facilityâs construction 99 but before its completion, no significant construction of the 100 facility occurs for a period of 24 months; or 101 b.âAfter becoming nonoperational due to a disaster or other 102 event beyond the control of the facility owner, no significant 103 reconstruction of the solar facility occurs for a period of 12 104 months. 105 (b)âA solar facility owner may rebut the presumption that a 106 solar facility has reached the end of its useful life by 107 submitting to the county a plan, a schedule, and adequate 108 assurances that construction or operation of the solar facility 109 will continue. 110 (c)âA county may require financial assurance from a solar 111 facility owner in the form of a bond, an irrevocable letter of 112 credit established pursuant to chapter 675, a guarantee by the 113 solar facility ownerâs parent company, or another financial 114 device deemed adequate by the county to establish that the solar 115 facility owner has the capability to satisfy the estimated cost 116 of decommissioning the solar facility. 117 (d)âIf a facility owner does not complete decommissioning 118 in the timeframe required by county ordinance, the county may 119 take action to complete the decommissioning, including action to 120 require forfeiture of the financial assurance provided under 121 paragraph (c). A county must allow a solar facility owner at 122 least 12 months to commence decommissioning and 24 months to 123 complete decommissioning before taking such action. 124 (6)âCONSTRUCTION BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICES.â 125 (a)âThe Department of Environmental Protection shall 126 develop best management practices (BMPs) for the construction of 127 a solar facility. Such BMPs must include, but are not limited 128 to, all of the following: 129 1.âRequirements for percolation testing on the premises of 130 a proposed solar facility. 131 2.âRequirements for stormwater runoff management during the 132 construction of a solar facility. 133 3.âRequirements for construction design that would enable a 134 solar facility to withstand a 100-year storm event. 135 (b)âThe Department of Environmental Protection shall update 136 and revise its BMPs annually. As part of the update and revision 137 process, the department shall review all settlements, consent 138 decrees, judgments, and resolutions of civil cases since 2020 139 which relate to the construction of a solar facility. 140 (c)âAn operator of a solar facility or a proposed solar 141 facility shall implement all BMPs developed pursuant to 142 paragraph (a). 143 (7)(5)âAPPLICABILITY.âThis section does not apply to any 144 site that was the subject of an application to construct a solar 145 facility submitted to a local governmental entity before July 1, 146 2021. 147 Section 2.âSubsections (4) and (11) of section 366.96, 148 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 149 366.96âStorm protection plan cost recovery.â 150 (4)âAt a minimum, any improvement included in a 151 transmission and distribution storm protection plan filed 152 pursuant to this section must have a forecasted customer benefit 153 that exceeds its forecasted cost. In addition, in its review of 154 each transmission and distribution storm protection plan filed 155 pursuant to this section, the commission shall consider: 156 (a)âThe extent to which the plan is expected to reduce 157 restoration costs and outage times associated with extreme 158 weather events and enhance reliability, including whether the 159 plan prioritizes areas of lower reliability performance and 160 whether the cost of implementing the plan is reasonable and 161 prudent, given the expected benefit. 162 (b)âThe extent to which storm protection of transmission 163 and distribution infrastructure is feasible, reasonable, or 164 practical in certain areas of the utilityâs service territory, 165 including, but not limited to, flood zones and rural areas. 166 (c)âThe estimated costs and benefits to the utility and its 167 customers of making the improvements proposed in the plan. 168 (d)âThe estimated annual rate impact resulting from 169 implementation of the plan during the first 3 years addressed in 170 the plan. 171 (e)Â The performance of previously approved plan 172 improvements in reducing outage times and storm restoration 173 costs. 174 (11)âThe commission shall adopt rules to implement and 175 administer this section and shall propose a rule for adoption as 176 soon as practicable after the effective date of this act, but 177 not later than October 31, 2019. 178 Section 3.âThe Public Service Commission shall submit a 179 proposed rule for adoption which implements the amendments made 180 by this act to s. 366.96, Florida Statutes, as soon as 181 practicable after the effective date of this act, but not later 182 than October 31, 2026. 183 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.